Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0042.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "enforcement support fund act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of treasury. (b) "Enforcement program" means program as that term is defined in the immigration and customs enforcement support act. (c) "Fund" means the immigration and customs enforcement support fund created in section 3. (d) "Law enforcement agency" means that term as defined in the immigration and customs enforcement support act. (e) "Law enforcement officer" means that term as defined in the immigration and customs enforcement support act. Sec. 3. (1) The immigration and customs enforcement support fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. Sec. 5. (1) Money in the fund may be used for the implementation and enforcement of the immigration and customs enforcement support act, including the administrative costs associated with implementing the immigration and customs enforcement support act. (2) By December 31, 2025, the department shall post instructions for law enforcement agencies to apply for a grant from the fund. The department shall post the instructions required under this subsection on a publicly available website. (3) A law enforcement agency may submit an application for a grant under this section to the department no later than March 15 each year. The department shall make a grant award under this section no later than May 1 of each year. (4) The department shall comply with all of the following in awarding a grant under this section: (a) The department shall first award grants sufficient to allow each law enforcement agency to train 3 law enforcement officers to participate in an enforcement program or to provide immigration enforcement assistance through a subsequent program to an enforcement program. (b) After the department has made awards under subdivision (a), the department may award a grant to a law enforcement agency to train additional law enforcement officers. A grant awarded under this subdivision must be based on the proportion of the population the law enforcement agency serves compared to the population served by other law enforcement agencies. (c) After the department has made grant awards under subdivisions (a) and (b), the department may award a law enforcement agency an additional grant of not more than $15,000.00 for each law enforcement officer to provide an incentive to that law enforcement officer to participate in an enforcement program. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 43 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.